Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.388.010 and 2022 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington state leadership board is designated a trustee for the state of Washington.(2) The purpose of the Washington state leadership board is to:(a) Provide the state a means of extending formal recognition for an individual's outstanding services to the state; and(b) Expand educational, sports, leadership, and/or employment opportunities for youth, veterans, and people with disabilities in Washington state by administering the following programs:(i) Washington world fellows;(ii) ((Sports mentoring;(iii))) Boundless Washington; and(((iv)))(iii) Compassion scholars.(3) The Washington state leadership board may conduct activities in support of their mission.(4)(a) The Washington state leadership board is governed by a board of directors. The board of directors is composed of the governor, the lieutenant governor, and the secretary of state, who serve as ex officio, nonvoting members, and other officers and members as the Washington state leadership board designates. In addition, four legislators may be appointed to the board of directors as ex officio members in the following manner: One legislator from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, and one legislator from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.(b) The Washington state leadership board shall appoint its executive director with the consent of the lieutenant governor. The lieutenant governor may remove an executive director for cause if a majority of the Washington state leadership board votes for removal.(5) The board of directors shall adopt bylaws and establish governance and transparency policies.(6) The lieutenant governor's office may provide facilities and administrative support for the Washington state leadership board, where the work of the board aligns with the mission of the office. Assistance from the lieutenant governor's office may include, but is not limited to:(a) Collaboration with the Washington state leadership board on the Washington world fellows program, a college readiness and study abroad fellowship; and(b) ((Collaboration with the Washington state leadership board to administer the sports mentoring program as established under RCW 43.388.040, a mentoring program to encourage underserved youth to join sports or otherwise participate in the area of sports. If approved by the board of directors, boundless Washington, an outdoor leadership program for young people with disabilities, shall satisfy the terms of the sports mentoring program; and(c))) The compilation of a yearly financial report, which shall be made available to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than January 15th of each year, detailing all revenues and expenditures associated with the Washington world fellows program ((and the sports mentoring program)).(7) The legislature may make appropriations in support of the Washington state leadership board subject to the availability of funds.(8) The Washington state leadership board must post on its website detailed information on all funds received by the board and all expenditures by the board.(9)(a) The Washington state leadership board may solicit and receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources that are made for the use or benefit of the board. The board may expend such funds or any income therefrom according to their terms and the purpose of this chapter, including but not limited to advancing the board's mission to cultivate leadership skills in Washington state youth and to strengthen statewide civic engagement, education, and service opportunities.(b) The executive director of the board shall report such funds received from private sources to the office of financial management on a regular basis.(c) Funds received from private sources under this subsection shall not be applied to reduce or substitute for the board's budget as appropriated by the legislature, but shall be applied and expended toward projects, programs, and functions authorized by this chapter that were not funded by the legislature.--- END ---